Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.190

Damages on dissolution of injunction to stay judgment.

When an injunction to stay proceedings after judgment for debt or damages shall be dissolved, the court shall award such damages not exceeding ten percent on the judgment, as the court may deem right, against the party in whose favor the injunction issued.

[Code 1881 s 170; 1877 p 34 s 170; 1869 p 41 s 168; 1854 p 154 s 128; RRS s 736.]